New York, session 2025-2026, A5421.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 51 of the legislative law is REPEALED and a new 2 section 51 is added to read as follows: 3 § 51. Fiscal impact notes on bills affecting the state or political 4 subdivisions. 1. As used in this section: 5 (a) the term "political subdivision" means any county, city, town, 6 village, special district or school district, or any agency, authority, 7 commission, department or instrumentality thereof. 8 (b) the term "qualifying bill" means any bill or amendment to a bill 9 filed on or after the effective date of this section which establishes 10 or eliminates a state program, significantly changes services required 11 to be provided by such program, or results in a change in revenues or 12 expenses of the state or any political subdivision. 13 2. Before discharging qualifying bills from consideration, the senate 14 finance committee or the assembly ways and means committee shall prepare 15 for each such bill a fiscal impact statement clearly detailing the esti- 16 mated cost or savings entailed by such bill to the state and affected 17 political subdivision for the three fiscal years following adoption of 18 such bill. Such fiscal impact statement shall also provide the source or 19 sources of such estimates. 20 3. A fiscal impact statement required to be prepared under this 21 section shall be made and shall remain a part of the bill it describes, 22 and shall be affixed to the bill before it is laid upon the members' 23 desks for consideration. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08626-01-5 A. 5421 2 1 4. In determining the fiscal impacts of a bill, the senate finance 2 committee and assembly ways and means committee shall estimate such 3 impacts on the basis of any or all of the following: 4 (a) individual political subdivisions; 5 (b) aggregates of political subdivisions either statewide or by a 6 lesser geographic area; 7 (c) representative political subdivisions with relevant character- 8 istics such as population, area, average income, weighted average daily 9 attendance of pupils, or any other relevant characteristics appropriate 10 to the estimate; or 11 (d) any other appropriate, convenient or accessible grouping of char- 12 acteristics or political subdivisions. 13 5. Estimated or actual fiscal impacts disclosed under this section 14 shall be reported in units of money, services, personnel, equipment, or 15 any other appropriate, convenient or accessible unit or units of meas- 16 urement. 17 6. If the estimates contained in a fiscal impact statement are inaccu- 18 rate, such inaccuracies shall not affect, impair or invalidate such 19 bill. 20 7. Fiscal impact statements shall not be required for bills: (a) 21 subject to the provisions of section fifty of this article, or (b) 22 accompanied by special home rule requests submitted by each affected 23 political subdivision, or (c) which provide only discretionary authority 24 to political subdivisions, or (d) submitted pursuant to section twenty- 25 four of the state finance law. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 27 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.